SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0613 Y 14
SFX 0613 na dyn ..
SFX 0613 na naj ..
SFX 0613 na ne ..
SFX 0613 na nej ..
SFX 0613 na neje ..
SFX 0613 na neju ..
SFX 0613 na ni ..
SFX 0613 na noho ..
SFX 0613 na nomu ..
SFX 0613 na nu ..
SFX 0613 na nych ..
SFX 0613 na nym ..
SFX 0613 na nymaj ..
SFX 0613 na nymi ..

SFX 0614 Y 13
SFX 0614 0 a .
SFX 0614 0 ach .
SFX 0614 0 aj .
SFX 0614 0 am .
SFX 0614 0 ami .
SFX 0614 0 ej .
SFX 0614 0 o .
SFX 0614 0 om .
SFX 0614 0 omaj .
SFX 0614 0 ow .
SFX 0614 0 u .
SFX 0614 0 źa .
SFX 0614 0 źe .

SFX 0615 Y 32
SFX 0615 ěj jaty ..
SFX 0615 ěj jał ..
SFX 0615 ěj jała ..
SFX 0615 ěj jałe ..
SFX 0615 ěj jało ..
SFX 0615 ěj jałoj ..
SFX 0615 ěj jeli ..
SFX 0615 ěj jeć ..
SFX 0615 ěj jeće ..
SFX 0615 ěj ěja ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějach ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějachmoj ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějachmy ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějachu ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějacy ..
SFX 0615 ěj ěje ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějemoj ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějemy ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějetaj ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějetej ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějeće ..
SFX 0615 ěj ěješ ..
SFX 0615 ěj ěješe ..
SFX 0615 ěj ěještaj ..
SFX 0615 ěj ěještej ..
SFX 0615 ěj ěješće ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějmoj ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějmy ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějtaj ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějtej ..
SFX 0615 ěj ěju ..
SFX 0615 ěj ějće ..

SFX 0616 Y 26
SFX 0616 a achmoj .
SFX 0616 a achmy .
SFX 0616 a achu .
SFX 0616 a acy .
SFX 0616 a amoj .
SFX 0616 a amy .
SFX 0616 a any .
SFX 0616 a ataj .
SFX 0616 a atej .
SFX 0616 a ał .
SFX 0616 a ała .
SFX 0616 a ało .
SFX 0616 a ałoj .
SFX 0616 a ej .
SFX 0616 a eja .
SFX 0616 a ejtaj .
SFX 0616 a ejtej .
SFX 0616 a ejće .
SFX 0616 a eli .
SFX 0616 a enje .
SFX 0616 a eć .
SFX 0616 a eće .
SFX 0616 a eše .
SFX 0616 a eštaj .
SFX 0616 a eštej .
SFX 0616 a ešće .

SFX 0617 Y 5
SFX 0617 0 ach .
SFX 0617 0 am .
SFX 0617 0 ami .
SFX 0617 0 i .
SFX 0617 0 ow .

SFX 0618 Y 29
SFX 0618 uj uja ..
SFX 0618 uj ujach ..
SFX 0618 uj ujachmoj ..
SFX 0618 uj ujachmy ..
SFX 0618 uj ujachu ..
SFX 0618 uj ujacy ..
SFX 0618 uj uje ..
SFX 0618 uj ujemoj ..
SFX 0618 uj ujemy ..
SFX 0618 uj ujetaj ..
SFX 0618 uj ujetej ..
SFX 0618 uj ujeće ..
SFX 0618 uj uješ ..
SFX 0618 uj uješe ..
SFX 0618 uj uještaj ..
SFX 0618 uj uještej ..
SFX 0618 uj uješće ..
SFX 0618 uj ujtaj ..
SFX 0618 uj ujtej ..
SFX 0618 uj uju ..
SFX 0618 uj ujće ..
SFX 0618 uj wali ..
SFX 0618 uj wanje ..
SFX 0618 uj wać ..
SFX 0618 uj wał ..
SFX 0618 uj wała ..
SFX 0618 uj wałe ..
SFX 0618 uj wało ..
SFX 0618 uj wałoj ..

SFX 0619 Y 11
SFX 0619 cy ka ..
SFX 0619 cy kach ..
SFX 0619 cy kaj ..
SFX 0619 cy kam ..
SFX 0619 cy kami ..
SFX 0619 cy kej ..
SFX 0619 cy ko ..
SFX 0619 cy kom ..
SFX 0619 cy komaj ..
SFX 0619 cy kow ..
SFX 0619 cy ku ..
